Utah statutes.
63A-5-305.   Leasing by higher education institutions.
(1)  The Board of Regents shall establish written policies and procedures
governing leasing by higher education institutions.
(2)  Except as provided in Section 53B-2a-113, each higher education
institution shall comply with the procedures and requirements of the Board of
Regents' policies before signing or renewing any lease.
